mg_MG.aff
FLAG long
SFX Ke Y 5
SFX Ke itra eto/IiAmD2D3D5D6Xx itra
SFX Ke itra etina/NuFiIjAmO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx itra
SFX Ke itra etam/FiIjAmXx itra
SFX Ke itra etan/FiIjAmXx itra
SFX Ke itra etana/FiIjAmO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx itra

SFX Da Y 8
SFX Da y iva/MmXx y
SFX Da ka ha/MnXx ka
SFX Da o ò/MmXx o
SFX Da 0 y o
SFX Da 0 in o
SFX Da 0 im o
SFX Da 0 y/IiXx o
SFX Da 0 ina/IiO2O3O5O6Xx o

SFX Ad Y 1
SFX Ad ana àna/MvXx ana

SFX Db N 7
SFX Db y o y
SFX Db y ìn y
SFX Db y ìm y
SFX Db y ìna y
SFX Db y ian y
SFX Db y iam y
SFX Db y iana y

SFX De N 1
SFX De y e y

SFX Df N 6
SFX Df ina eno ina
SFX Df ina enon ina
SFX Df ina enom ina
SFX Df ina enonao ina
SFX Df ina enontsika ina
SFX Df ina enonareo ina

SFX Dg Y 1
SFX Dg ina ena/MmXx ina

SFX Di Y 7
SFX Di 0 o/NuD2D3D5D6Xx .
SFX Di 0 in .
SFX Di 0 im .
SFX Di 0 ina .
SFX Di 0 in/TpXx .
SFX Di 0 im/TpXx .
SFX Di 0 ina/TpO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx .

SFX Dj N 7
SFX Dj y ivo y
SFX Dj y ivon y
SFX Dj y ivom y
SFX Dj y ivonao y
SFX Dj y ivony y
SFX Dj y ivontsika y
SFX Dj y ivonareo y

SFX Dk N 1
SFX Dk ka ho ka

SFX Dl Y 7
SFX Dl a o/IiD2D3D5D6Xx a
SFX Dl a in/IjXx a
SFX Dl a im/IjXx a
SFX Dl a ina/IjXx a
SFX Dl a an/IjXx a
SFX Dl a am/IjXx a
SFX Dl a ana/IjXx a

SFX Dm Y 8
SFX Dm 0 0/MmXx .
SFX Dm 0 n/IjFiXx .
SFX Dm 0 m/IjFiXx .
SFX Dm 0 na/IjFiO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx .
SFX Dm a à/MmXx a
SFX Dm a àn/IjFiXx a
SFX Dm a àm/IjFiXx a
SFX Dm a àna/IjFiO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx a

SFX Do Y 1
SFX Do y ivo/IiD2D3D5D6Xx y

SFX Dr Y 10
SFX Dr tra ra/MmXx tra
SFX Dr tra ro/IiD2D3D5D6Xx tra
SFX Dr tra ran/IjFiXx tra
SFX Dr tra ram/IjFiXx tra
SFX Dr tra rana/IjFiO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx tra
SFX Dr ka fa/MmXx ka
SFX Dr ka fy/IiD2D3D5D6Xx ka
SFX Dr ka fam/FiXx ka
SFX Dr ka fan/FiXx ka
SFX Dr ka fana/FiO1O2O3O4O5O6Xx ka

SFX Dp Y 6
SFX Dp tra ra/MmXx tra
SFX Dp tra ra/M4Xx tra
SFX Dp tra ro/DhD2D3D5D6Xx tra
SFX Dp tra ran/M4Xx tra
SFX Dp tra ram/M4Xx tra
SFX Dp tra rana/M4O1O2O3O4O5O6Xx tra

SFX Ds N 14
SFX Ds ky kezo ky
SFX Ds ky kezom ky
SFX Ds ky kezon ky
SFX Ds ky kezonao ky
SFX Ds ky kezony ky
SFX Ds ky kezontsika ky
SFX Ds ky kezonareo ky
SFX Ds ka fy ka
SFX Ds ka fim ka
SFX Ds ka fin ka
SFX Ds ka finao ka
SFX Ds ka finy ka
SFX Ds ka fintsika ka
SFX Ds ka finareo ka

SFX Dt Y 1
SFX Dt a o/NuD2D3D5D6Xx a

SFX Dv Y 1
SFX Dv 0 o/NuD2D3D5D6Xx .

SFX Sa Y 4
SFX Sa y aso/NuD2D3D5D6Xx y
SFX Sa y asam/FiM6Xx y
SFX Sa y asan/FiM6Xx y
SFX Sa y asana/FiIjM6O1O2O3O4O5O6Xx y

SFX Tj N 17
SFX Tj y in y
SFX Tj y im y
SFX Tj y ina y
SFX Tj y iko y
SFX Tj y inao y
SFX Tj y iny y
SFX Tj y intsika y
SFX Tj y inay y
SFX Tj y inareo y
SFX Tj y ian y
SFX Tj y iam y
SFX Tj y iana y
SFX Tj y iako y
SFX Tj y ianao y
SFX Tj y iany y
SFX Tj y iantsika y
SFX Tj y ianay y

SFX Ta! N 1
SFX Ta! 0 o .

SFX Ra Y 1
SFX Ra a ana a

SFX Ag N 15
SFX Ag na m na
SFX Ag na ko na
SFX Ag 0 o a
SFX Ag a y a
SFX Ag 0 y a
SFX Ag na ntsika na
SFX Ag ka tsika ka
SFX Ag 0 reo a
SFX Ag tra tr tra
SFX Ag tra tro tra
SFX Ag tra tsika tra
SFX Ag tra ny tra
SFX Ag ka k ka
SFX Ag ka ko ka
SFX Ag ka ny ka

SFX Aj N 16
SFX Aj 0 m [^y]
SFX Aj 0 n [^y]
SFX Aj 0 ko [^y]
SFX Aj 0 nao [^y]
SFX Aj 0 ny [^y]
SFX Aj 0 ntsika [^y]
SFX Aj 0 nay [^y]
SFX Aj 0 nareo [^y]
SFX Aj y im y
SFX Aj y in y
SFX Aj y iko y
SFX Aj y inao y
SFX Aj y iny y
SFX Aj y intsika y
SFX Aj y inay y
SFX Aj y inareo y

SFX Ak Y 8
SFX Ak na n/FiXx na
SFX Ak na m/FiXx na
SFX Ak na ko/FiXx na
SFX Ak a ao/FiXx a
SFX Ak a y/FiXx a
SFX Ak a tsika/FiXx n
SFX Ak a ay/FiXx a
SFX Ak a areo/FiXx a

SFX Ap N 4
SFX Ap 0 m [aoie]
SFX Ap 0 n [aoie]
SFX Ap y im y
SFX Ap y in y

SFX As N 2
SFX As na n na
SFX As na m na

SFX At N 1
SFX At aka a aka

SFX Ky N 1
SFX Ky a y a
